Illinois, session 104th, HB371.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Display of Tobacco Products Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 677/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Display of Tobacco Products Act. 9(Source: P.A. 93-886, eff. 1-1-05.)